North Carolina statutes. Chapter 31A. Acts Barring Property Rights.
Article 2. Parents.

§ 31A-2.
Acts barring rights of parents.

Any parent who has wilfully abandoned the care and maintenance of his or her child shall lose all right to intestate succession in any part of the child’s estate and all right to administer the estate of the child, except —

Where the abandoning parent resumed its care and maintenance at least one year prior to the death of the child and continued the same until its death; or

Where a parent has been deprived of the custody of his or her child under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction and the parent has substantially complied with all orders of the court requiring contribution to the support of the child.

History.

1961, c. 210, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on forfeitures of property rights by slayers, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 448 (1976).

For comment, “In re Estate of Lunsford and Statutory Ambiguity: Trying to Reconcile Child Abandonment and the Intestate Succession Act,” see 81 N.C.L. Rev. 1149 (2003).

For casenote: “McKinney v. Richitelli: Abandoning Parents and Presumptive Penalties,” see 26 N.C. Cent. L.J. 116 (2003).